Vermont, session 2025-2026, H70.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 2801 is amended to read:
§ 2801. DEFINITIONS
As used in this section:
* * *
(3) “Natural resource management area” means an area having
permanent protection from conversion for the majority of the area but that is
subject to long-term, sustainable land management or agricultural land or
forestland that is enrolled in the Use Value Appraisal Program pursuant to 32
V.S.A. chapter 124.
* * *
(6) “Conserved” means permanently protected and meeting the
definition of ecological reserve area, biodiversity conservation area, or natural
resource management area as defined in this section for purposes of meeting
the 30 percent goal in subsection 2802(b) of this title. For purposes of meeting
the 50 percent goal of subsection 2802(b) of this title, “conserved” primarily
means permanently protected and meeting the definition of ecological reserve
area, biodiversity conservation area, or natural resource management area as
defined in this section, although other long-term land protection mechanisms
and measures that achieve the goals of Vermont Conservation Design that are
VT LEG #379322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.70
2025 Page 3 of 3
enforceable and accountable and that support an ecologically functional and
connected landscape may be considered.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379322 v.1